Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 1

General Provisions

70-2-101. Taking wildlife without license — Migratory waterfowl stamps — Licenses nontransferable — Revocation or suspension — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person in this state to hunt, chase, trap, kill or take any form of wildlife in the open season, unless the person so hunting, chasing, trapping, killing or taking, or attempting to take, such wild animals, wild birds, wild fowl, or fish at the time possesses the requisite license prescribed by this chapter, such license, of proper color and design, to be on the person of the licensee while hunting, chasing, trapping or fishing.

A valid federal migratory waterfowl stamp must be possessed while hunting migratory waterfowl by any person over sixteen (16) years of age, which stamp shall be cancelled in ink by the signature of the hunting licensee.

No license or permit, required and issued under this chapter, may be loaned or transferred to any other person, firm or corporation.

Upon conviction for any offense against this title, any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this title, or any proclamation of the fish and wildlife commission, the court may revoke the license or suspend any or all of the fishing, hunting, or trapping privileges of the person so convicted, or both revoke the license and revoke any or all of the fishing, hunting or trapping privileges of the person so convicted.

Any license so revoked shall be surrendered to the court and transmitted to the arresting officer, to be made a part of the prosecution record.

Any person whose license has been revoked or whose privileges have been suspended, or both, may be prohibited from fishing, hunting and trapping for a period of time of not less than one (1) year to be fixed by the court.

Any violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor and punishable by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Any person who violates the revocation order of the court may be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and may be confined in the county jail or workhouse not less than ten (10) days nor more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days, it being mandatory upon the court to impose the prison sentence, and the minimum time may not be subject to suspension.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 12, 16; 1953, ch. 255, § 2 (Williams, §§ 5178.41, 5178.45); Acts 1955, ch. 152, § 6; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1980, ch. 736, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-201; Acts 1987, ch. 24, § 1; 1990, ch. 891, § 6; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Exotic animals, title 70, ch. 4, part 4.

Fees and penalties not to be established by rule or regulation, § 70-1-102.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Felon or domestic violence offender obtaining a Tennessee hunting license; restrictions on type of weapon used for hunting; ability to supervise juvenile who is hunting. OAG 10-21, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/24/10).

Licenses to hunt and possession of firearms and effect of conviction of certain felonies and other offenses. OAG 15-33, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/10/15).

70-2-102. Licensing requirement — Penalty.

Every person shall, before hunting, fishing, or trapping, as the case may be, in this state, possess a license in accordance with the schedules in this title, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 10 (Williams, § 5178.39); modified; Acts 1961, ch. 198, § 1; 1981, ch. 83, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-202; Acts 1990, ch. 981, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority for hunting license exemptions, OAG 99-002, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (1/19/99).

Licenses to hunt and possession of firearms and effect of conviction of certain felonies and other offenses. OAG 15-33, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/10/15).

70-2-103. Exception to licensing requirement — Military personnel on furlough.

Any member of the armed forces or services while on furlough or other temporary military leave of absence has the right to hunt and fish in this state during the appropriate seasons for hunting and fishing as fixed by law, without the necessity of procuring a license.

In order for any person to hunt and fish without the required license, the person shall have in that person's possession at all times a copy of that person's furlough papers or other military orders showing that such person is officially on leave of absence from the military service. Such military papers or orders are subject to examination and inspection by duly constituted officers of the wildlife resources agency at all times.

Acts 1953, ch. 253, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, § 5178.39a); 1959, ch. 145, § 4; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-205.

70-2-104. Persons entitled to license without fee or at reduced fee — Designation of assistant — Penalty for false information — Imposition of fee.

The wildlife resources director and the director's agents, through the county clerks or other legally designated license sales agents, have the power to issue a:

Sport fishing license without the payment of a license fee to those residents of Tennessee who are certified to be blind, having a visual acuity, with maximum correction, not exceeding 20/200 in the better eye or having a visual acuity exceeding 20/200 but accompanied by a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees (20°). The director shall accept as evidence, for the purposes of this title, a certificate from the department of human services or from a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state and who is actively engaged in the treatment of diseases of the human eye, or a licensed, registered optometrist, certifying that such person meets the requirements of this section with reference to the degree of blindness as defined in this subdivision (a)(1);

Sport fishing and hunting license without the payment of a fee to residents of Tennessee who by reason of service in any war are thirty percent (30%) or more disabled. The director shall accept as evidence of service-connected disability for the purposes of this section a certification from the veterans' administration;

Hunting license to persons with intellectual disabilities who reside in this state and who are over ten (10) years of age. The director shall accept as evidence for the purposes of this subdivision (a)(3) a certificate from a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state certifying that the applicant meets the requirements of this section with reference to such disability. The person must be accompanied by an adult at least twenty-five (25) years of age or older, who is hunter-education-certified and licensed to hunt. The person shall be required to complete the hunter education course as provided in § 70-2-108 in the presence of a licensed adult, but shall not be required to attain a particular score on the course examination or take the course more than once;

As used in this subdivision (a)(3), unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accompanied” means the licensed adult shall supervise no more than one (1) person with intellectual disabilities at any one (1) time and shall be able to take immediate control of the hunting device;

“Persons with intellectual disabilities” means persons who possess an intellectual disability, as defined by § 33-1-101;

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of subdivision (a)(3)(A), including, but not limited to, rules and regulations to specifically denote on the license that the person issued the license is a person with intellectual disabilities, and to create a one-time-only fee in an amount sufficient to cover the costs of implementing subdivision (a)(3)(A); and

Permanent sport combination hunting and fishing license upon payment of a one-time ten-dollar ($10.00) fee to those residents of Tennessee who are permanently restricted to wheelchairs. The director shall accept as evidence for the purposes of this section a certificate from a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state certifying that the applicant meets the requirements of this section with reference to permanent restriction to a wheelchair; or

Permanent sport combination hunting and fishing license upon payment of a one-time ten-dollar ($10.00) fee to those residents of Tennessee who are one hundred percent (100%) permanently and totally service connected disabled veterans who apply for such discounts and exemptions prior to or after May 24, 2000. The agency shall accept as evidence of service-connected disability for the purposes of this subdivision (a)(4)(B) a certification from the veterans' administration.

The fish and wildlife commission shall by proclamation designate one (1) week of each year when any person who receives social security benefits due to intellectual disability may engage in all forms of sport fishing, and all sport fishing license requirements shall be suspended during such week for such persons. The agency may accept as evidence for purposes of this section a certificate from the social security administration or any other evidence acceptable to the executive director.

A resident of Tennessee who receives social security benefits due to intellectual disability is entitled to the privilege of sport fishing upon presentation of evidence of such disability satisfactory to the agency. Such resident shall be issued a permanent license for sport fishing.

The giving of false information as to name, age, degree of blindness, percentage of disability, permanent restriction to a wheelchair, address, residence or nonresidence by any applicant for any license provided for in this chapter, or altering any license or permit or any application for any license or permit, is a Class C misdemeanor.

The license fee discounts and exemptions provided in subsections (a) and (b) shall apply to qualified residents of Tennessee who apply for such discounts or exemptions prior to May 24, 2000.

For qualified residents of Tennessee who have not applied for such discounts or exemptions prior to May 24, 2000, there shall be imposed a one-time ten-dollar ($10.00) fee for such license; provided, that such fee shall not apply to the exemption granted in subdivision (b)(1).

Any qualified resident of Tennessee who has applied for such discount or exemption prior to May 24, 2000, may nevertheless make a voluntary payment of the one-time ten-dollar ($10.00) fee and upon making such payment shall be issued a license in accordance with this section.

This subsection (e) shall be known and may be cited as the “Hunter Wright Hunting and Fishing Act.”

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, the wildlife resources director and the director's agents, through the county clerks or other legally designated license sales agents, have the power to issue an annual sport combination hunting and fishing license upon payment of a five-dollar fee to residents who are under eighteen (18) years of age and who are disabled.

As used in this subsection (e), “disabled” means the inability to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment that is certified by a licensed physician. This means that the condition must be both totally and permanently disabling. The director shall accept as evidence for the purposes of this subsection (e) a certificate from a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state certifying that the applicant meets the requirements of this subsection (e) with reference to being disabled.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, to specifically denote on the license that the person is disabled.

The agency shall be reimbursed for lost revenue resulting from the issuance of free or partially discounted combination hunting and fishing licenses created by statute on or after January 1, 2017, in an amount equal to the discounts received.

Subdivision (f)(1)(A) shall also apply to lost revenue resulting from exemptions to licensure requirements created by statute on or after January 1, 2017, in an amount equal to the amount of lost revenue from such exemptions.

The agency shall maintain an accounting of lost revenue, as described in subdivision (f)(1), and shall submit the accounting to the department of finance and administration for the payment of moneys in an amount equal to such lost revenue out of the general fund on or before June 30 of each fiscal year.

Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the accounting from the agency, the department of finance and administration must pay the actual amount of lost revenue for the fiscal year into the wildlife resources fund established in § 70-1-401.

The accounting maintained pursuant to subdivision (f)(2)(A) and any other records relating to the accounting shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Any reimbursement to the agency for lost revenue pursuant to subdivision (f)(1)(A) shall be made from the general fund, subject to an appropriation by the general assembly in the annual general appropriations act.

A person may assist a resident of this state who obtains a license under subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(4), or (b)(2), or subsection (e), or who is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b)(1), without the necessity of procuring a license, if:

The person who qualifies for a license under subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(4), or (b)(2), or subsection (e), or who is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b)(1), completes and retains a form that designates one (1) person as an assistant and identifies the assistant by driver license number or by some other unique identifying number that appears on a form of identification issued to the assistant by a governmental entity. A person may only designate one (1) person as an assistant for hunting or fishing purposes each calendar year, except in the case of the death of the designated assistant. The agency shall develop a form that may be used to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision (g)(1), and make the form available to the public on the agency's website;

The person providing assistance is not hunting or fishing on the person's own behalf. No extra bag limit or creel limit is permitted for an assistant who is not licensed to hunt or fish in this state, as applicable; and

The assistant does not possess:

A fishing pole, unless the assistant has a valid license to fish in this state;

A firearm, unless the assistant has a valid license to hunt in this state, a concealed handgun carry permit, or an enhanced handgun carry permit; or

Any weapon other than a firearm that the agency has authorized by proclamation to be used for the taking of game, unless the assistant has a valid license to hunt in this state.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 10 (Williams, § 5178.39); 1955, ch. 62, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 16-21; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 682, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1982, ch. 738, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-208, 51-209; Acts 1989, ch. 309, § 1; 1990, ch. 981, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 603, § 1; 2000, ch. 837, § 4; 2004, ch. 829, § 1; 2011, ch. 197, § 1; 2012, ch. 713, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 954, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2017, ch. 330, § 1; 2020, ch. 737, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 197, § 3 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, which amended subdivisions (b)(1) and (2), a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before May 12, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 197, § 4 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subdivisions (b)(1) and (2), shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before May 12, 2011.

Acts 2017, ch. 330, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section by adding (f), shall apply to all free or discounted licenses issued on or after May 9, 2017.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 737, § 2. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Commercial fishers who are state residents and over 70 years of age exempt from commercial licensing provisions, § 70-2-205.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-105. Preparation and distribution of license forms to county clerk or other agent — Maintenance and remittance of funds.

The executive director shall prepare and deliver to each county clerk or other agent authorized to issue and sell licenses, tags, registrations and other privileges as described in § 70-2-106, as many blank forms as may be required.

Each county clerk or authorized agent shall maintain all funds collected on behalf of the agency in a checking account available for electronic transfer within twenty-four (24) hours.

Any agent failing to make the required remittance available as required in this section shall be deemed delinquent and shall pay a penalty of five percent (5%) on all funds that were owed and that were not remitted or paid over within the time prescribed by this section. In addition, such agent, in the discretion of the executive director, may forfeit the privilege to sell any future licenses, tags, registrations and other privileges as described in § 70-2-106.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 8 (Williams, § 5178.37); 1957, ch. 323, §§ 3, 4; 1959, ch. 64, § 2; 1961, ch. 198, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 243, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-227; Acts 1999, ch. 102, § 1.

70-2-106. Agents for issuance and sale of licenses, permits, stamps, tags, or privileges — Bond — Fees of items — Fees of agents — Conservation stamps.

All hunting and fishing licenses, other licenses, permits, tags, registrations or privileges as specified by the agency and provided for in this title or in title 69, chapter 9, may be issued and sold by the county clerk of each county, or by any other person, firm or corporation designated and appointed by the executive director.

Any appointed agent, before being furnished with items to sell, may be required to execute a bond in such sum as the executive director shall require, with some solvent surety company qualified to do business in the state, as surety on sums due, conditioned to faithfully perform the duties imposed upon such appointed agent and to faithfully account for and promptly pay over to the executive director any and all sums due to the wildlife resources agency.

The county clerk of each county or any other person, firm or corporation designated and appointed by the executive director as such agent is entitled to collect from the purchaser of all licenses, permits, stamps, tags, registrations or other privileges sold, as specified by the agency, a flat fee of one dollar ($1.00) on any one (1) annual license, permit, stamp, tag, registration or other privilege sold, as specified by the agency, and fifty cents (50¢) on any one (1) license, permit, stamp, tag, registration and other privilege, as specified by the agency, which is valid for a specified day or number of days. Alternatively, the executive director is authorized to establish an agent fee, through competitive bidding contract procedures, for the successful bidder to sell licenses, permits, stamps, tags, registrations and other privileges as specified by the agency, over the telephone or through other electronic means.

The executive director, the county clerk of each county, and the agents designated and appointed by the executive director as such agents for the sale of licenses, shall offer for sale conservation stamps, including, but not limited to, full-color waterfowl stamps for a cost of ten dollars ($10.00) each. Any revenues from such stamps over and above the cost of producing and distributing the stamps shall go into habitat improvement. Possession of a stamp is voluntary and is not required in order to hunt, fish or trap.

The general assembly shall review and reauthorize the conservation stamp program after it has been in operation for three (3) years.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 9 (Williams, § 5178.38); 1955, ch. 152, § 8; 1957, ch. 221, § 2; 1969, ch. 84, § 1; 1973, ch. 328, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1975, ch. 282, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1981, ch. 359, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-228; Acts 1985, ch. 350, § 10; 1989, ch. 18, § 1; 1989, ch. 486, § 1; 1998, ch. 1023, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 102, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Reelfoot preservation permit, § 70-2-219.

70-2-107. Date of issuance of license or permit — Duration — Penalty for violations.

Licenses and permits required under this and any other law relating to wildlife shall be dated the true date of issue. All annual sport licenses shall be issued for the year beginning March 1 and ending the last day of February of the following year, both inclusive.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

In addition to the annual licenses authorized by subsection (a), the agency is authorized to issue any hunting, fishing or trapping license for periods exceeding one (1) year.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 13; 1953, ch. 255, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 5178.42, 5178.45); 1957, ch. 323, §§ 5, 6; 1979, ch. 243, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-229; Acts 1990, ch. 981, § 4; 1999, ch. 102, § 5; 2005, ch. 360, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 360, § 2 provided that the Tennessee wildlife resources agency is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-108. Hunter education course.

Every person born on or after January 1, 1969, before hunting, shall possess, in addition to all other licenses and permits required, proof of satisfactory completion of an agency approved hunter education course, except this provision shall not apply to persons under ten (10) years of age accompanied by an adult at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules to create a permit for a fee exempting persons from the hunter education requirements of this section for a twelve-month period, as long as the person possesses all other licenses and permits required, and, if ten (10) years of age or older, the person must be accompanied by a licensed adult at least twenty-one (21) years of age or older, who is hunter-education-certified or otherwise exempt by law.

Effective July 1, 2015, a person who meets the requirements of subdivision (a)(2)(A) may purchase the permit annually for up to three (3) consecutive years.

For the purpose of this section, “accompanied” is defined as being able to take immediate control of the hunting device.

The state board of education is encouraged to develop a section related to hunter education as a part of its safety education curriculum.

This section shall not apply to persons hunting or fishing within the guidelines of § 70-2-204.

As punishment, any person violating this section shall have all hunting privileges suspended and the person's license shall be taken by the arresting officer. Submission of proof of satisfactory completion of an agency approved hunter education course shall entitle a person to the return of that person's license and the restoration of hunting privileges.

Acts 1983, ch. 452, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 891, § 7; 2006, ch. 852, § 1; 2008, ch. 1061, § 1; 2015, ch. 417, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Felon or domestic violence offender obtaining a Tennessee hunting license; restrictions on type of weapon used for hunting; ability to supervise juvenile who is hunting. OAG 10-21, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/24/10).

Licenses to hunt and possession of firearms and effect of conviction of certain felonies and other offenses. OAG 15-33, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/10/15).

70-2-109. Free Sport Fishing Day.

The fish and wildlife commission may designate by proclamation one (1) day each year as “free sport fishing day” and all sport fishing license requirements as designated by proclamation for that day shall be suspended.

Acts 1990, ch. 615, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Additional special observance days, § 15-2-101.

Legal holidays, § 15-1-101.

70-2-110. Free hunting day for persons with disabilities.

The fish and wildlife commission shall authorize persons with disabilities one (1) day each year to hunt in a wildlife resources agency sponsored hunt, and all hunting license requirements for such persons for that day and purpose shall be suspended. For the purposes of this section, persons with disabilities shall be those people entitled to receive placards as provided in title 55, chapter 21, part 1.

Acts 2005, ch. 88, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 95; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.